Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202671-24,106
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act, how cited.

Sections 71-24,106 to 71-24,114 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Medical Cannabis Regulation Act.

Initiative Law 2024, No. 438, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB1235, § 5.
April 8, 2026
Nebraska Medical Cannabis Patient Protection Act, see section 71-24,103.